Georgia statutes. TITLE 21 Elections
PART 1 General Provisions
21-2-133.
Giving notice of intent of write-in candidacy; filing of affidavit; limitations on candidacy; certification of candidates.

No person elected on a write-in vote shall be eligible to hold office unless notice of his or her intention of candidacy was filed and published no earlier than January 1 and no later than the Tuesday after the first Monday in September prior to the election for county, state, and federal elections; no later than seven days after the close of the qualifying period for nonpartisan elections in the case of nonpartisan elections for state or county offices; no later than seven days after the close of the municipal qualifying period for municipal elections in the case of a general election; or no later than seven days after the close of the special election qualifying period for a special election by the person to be a write-in candidate or by some other person or group of persons qualified to vote in the subject election, as follows:

In a state general or special election, notice shall be filed with the Secretary of State and published in a newspaper of general circulation in the state;

In a general or special election of county officers, notice shall be filed with the superintendent of elections in the county in which he or she is to be a candidate and published in the official organ of the same county; or

In a municipal general or special election, notice shall be filed with the superintendent and published in the official gazette of the municipality holding the election.

In the event that such intention of candidacy is filed and published by a person or group of persons other than the candidate, such person or group of persons shall also file a written, notarized authorization by the candidate for such filing and publication.

In addition to the requirements contained in subsection (a) of this Code section, the person or persons giving notice of intention of candidacy for a write-in candidate shall also file, with the appropriate official specified in paragraph (1), (2), or (3) of subsection (a) of this Code section, a copy of the notice as published with an affidavit stating that the notice has been published and including the name of the newspaper and the date of publication, not later than the fifth day after the deadline for filing and publishing such notice. The affidavit may be made by the person giving notice of intention of candidacy or by the publisher of the newspaper in which the notice was published or by an employee of the newspaper designated by the publisher.

No person shall be eligible as a write-in candidate in a special or general primary, a special or general primary runoff, or in a special or general election runoff.

No person shall be eligible as a write-in candidate in a general or special election if such person was a candidate for nomination or election to the same office in the immediately preceding primary.

The Secretary of State shall certify and transmit to the election superintendent of each county affected within five days following the deadline for the submission by write-in candidates of the notice and documentation required by this Code section to be a write-in candidate in a general or special election the names of all persons who have filed notices of intention to be write-in candidates with the Secretary of State for such general or special election.

The county election superintendent shall certify within five days following the deadline for the submission by write-in candidates for county offices of the notice and documentation required by this Code section to be a write-in candidate in a general or special election the names of all persons who have filed notices of intention to be write-in candidates with the county election superintendent for county offices for such general or special election.

The municipal election superintendent shall certify within five days following the deadline for the submission by write-in candidates for municipal offices of the notice and documentation required by this Code section to be a write-in candidate in a general or special election the names of all persons who have filed notices of intention to be write-in candidates with the municipal election superintendent for municipal offices for such general or special election.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-1017, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1004, § 17; Ga. L. 1979, p. 963, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 417, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 1360, § 6; Ga. L. 1989, p. 682, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 590, § 9; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 21, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 52, § 6; Ga. L. 2001, p. 230, § 5; Ga. L. 2001, p. 269, § 6; Ga. L. 2001, Ex. Sess., p. 325, § 3; Ga. L. 2002, p. 437, § 1; Ga. L. 2005, p. 253, § 15/HB 244; Ga. L. 2011, p. 678, § 2/HB 158; Ga. L. 2012, p. 995, § 6/SB 92; Ga. L. 2017, p. 697, § 4/HB 268.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, added the ending undesignated paragraph of subsection (a).

Cross references.

Persons not eligible to hold office, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. II, Sec. II, Para. III.

Write-in votes in precincts using optical scanning voting equipment, §

21-2-486

.

Editor’s notes.

Owing to the duplication in subsection designations in the 1987 amendments, the subsection (b) added by Ga. L. 1987, p. 1360 was unofficially redesignated as subsection (d).

Law reviews.

For note on the 2001 amendment to this Code section, see 18 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 114 (2001).

For article, “Local Government Law,” see 53 Mercer L. Rev. 389 (2001).

21-2-134.
Withdrawal, death, or disqualification of candidate for office; return of qualifying fee; nomination certificate.

A candidate nominated at any primary election or nominated by means other than a primary may withdraw as a candidate at the ensuing general election by filing a notarized affidavit of withdrawal with the Secretary of State, if nominated for a state office; the county superintendent, if nominated for a county office; or the municipal superintendent, if nominated for a municipal office. If the ballots have been printed, the Secretary of State, the county superintendent, or the municipal superintendent may reprint the ballots to omit the name of the withdrawn candidate. All votes cast for the withdrawn candidate shall be void and shall not be counted. Prominent notices shall be posted in all polling places in which the name of the withdrawn candidate appears on the ballot stating that such candidate has withdrawn and that all votes cast for such withdrawn candidate shall be void and shall not be counted. No vacancy on the ballot for a general election or for a nonpartisan election shall be filled except by reason of the death or disqualification of a candidate or the withdrawal of a candidate as provided in paragraph (2) of subsection (b) of this Code section.

A candidate in a general or special primary may withdraw as a candidate after qualifying but prior to the date of the general or special primary by filing a notarized affidavit of withdrawal with the Secretary of State, if qualifying for a state office; the county election superintendent, if qualifying for a county office; or the municipal superintendent, if qualifying for a municipal office. A candidate of a political body or an independent candidate in a general or special election may withdraw as a candidate after qualifying but prior to the date of the general or special election by filing a notarized affidavit of withdrawal with the Secretary of State, if qualifying for a state office; the county election superintendent, if qualifying for a county office; or the municipal superintendent, if qualifying for a municipal office. If the ballots have been printed, the Secretary of State, the county election superintendent, or the municipal superintendent may reprint the ballots to omit the name of the withdrawn candidate. All votes cast for the withdrawn candidate shall be void and shall not be counted. Prominent notices shall be posted in all polling places in which the name of the withdrawn candidate appears on the ballot stating that such candidate has withdrawn and that all votes cast for such withdrawn candidate shall be void and shall not be counted.

Any vacancy in any party nomination filled by a primary created by reason of the death or disqualification of a candidate occurring after nomination may be filled in the following manner:

In the case of a public office to be filled by the vote of the electors of this entire state in which the vacancy occurs after nomination but at least ten days prior to the election to fill the public office sought by such candidate, the vacancy may be filled by a substitute nomination made by a convention composed of the delegates of the county executive committee of such party in each county of this state. Immediately upon such vacancy occurring, the state executive committee or a subcommittee thereof appointed for the purpose shall fix a time within six days of the occurrence of such vacancy; shall select and provide a convenient place for the holding of such a convention, which shall be open to the public; and shall give notice thereof to the chairperson and secretary of each county executive committee. Each county executive committee shall be entitled to select the number of delegates apportioned to it by the state executive committee; provided, however, that each county executive committee shall be entitled to select at least one delegate. Such apportionment of delegates among the counties shall be based substantially upon the population of this state according to the last United States decennial census or upon the number of votes cast within this state for the party’s candidates for presidential electors in the last presidential election. A two-thirds’ majority of the delegates of such county executive committees shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business, and a majority of the delegates present while a quorum exists shall be sufficient to fill such nomination by a substitute nomination. Each delegate shall have one vote, and all votes taken shall be by a roll-call vote. The records of the convention shall be filed with the state executive committee. In the event such a vacancy in party nomination shall occur during the ten days preceding the day of such an election, such vacancy may be filled by a substitute nomination made by the state executive committee or a subcommittee thereof appointed for that purpose;

In the case of a public office for which a candidate must qualify with the state executive committee, except a public office to be filled by the vote of the electors of the entire state, the nomination may remain vacant or may be filled at the decision of the state executive committee of the party. The decision whether to fill such vacancy shall be made by the state executive committee by 4:00 P.M. on the next business day following the actual knowledge of the death or disqualification of the candidate. The decision of the state executive committee shall be immediately transmitted to the Secretary of State. If the Secretary of State has not been notified of the decision of the state executive committee by 4:30 P.M. on the next business day following the actual knowledge of the vacancy, it shall be conclusively presumed that the state executive committee has decided not to fill the vacancy. If the state executive committee decides not to fill the vacancy, the nomination shall remain vacant. If the state executive committee decides to fill the vacancy, the vacancy shall be filled by a substitute nomination made by the state executive committee or a subcommittee thereof appointed for that purpose;

In the case of a public office for which a candidate must qualify with the county executive committee, the nomination may remain vacant or may be filled at the decision of the state executive committee of the party. The state executive committee or a subcommittee thereof may determine on its own whether to fill the vacancy but is authorized, though not required, to seek the recommendation of any of the following persons for the purpose of determining whether to fill the vacancy: the county executive committee, if any; persons from the area who are active in the party; persons who are present or former officials of the party; persons who presently hold political office or have sought political office as candidates of the party; or such other persons as the committee or subcommittee may desire to consult. The decision whether to fill such vacancy shall be made by the state executive committee by 4:00 P.M. on the next business day following the actual knowledge of the death or disqualification of the candidate. The decision of the state executive committee shall be immediately transmitted to the county superintendent. If the county superintendent has not been notified of the decision of the state executive committee by 4:30 P.M. on the next business day following the actual knowledge of the vacancy, it shall be conclusively presumed that the state executive committee has decided not to fill the vacancy. If the state executive committee decides not to fill the vacancy, the nomination shall remain vacant. If the state executive committee decides to fill the vacancy, the vacancy shall be filled by a substitute nomination made by the state executive committee or a subcommittee thereof appointed for that purpose. The state executive committee or a subcommittee thereof may determine on its own who shall fill the vacancy as a substitute nominee but is authorized, though not required, to seek the recommendation of any of the following persons for the purpose of determining the most suitable substitute nomination: the county executive committee, if any; persons from the area who are active in the party; persons who are present or former officials of the party; persons who presently hold political office or have sought political office as candidates of the party; or such other persons as the committee or subcommittee may desire to consult; and

In the case of a public office for which a candidate must qualify with the municipal executive committee, the nomination may remain vacant or may be filled at the decision of the municipal executive committee of the party. The decision whether to fill such vacancy shall be made by the municipal executive committee by 4:00 P.M. on the next business day following the actual knowledge of the death or disqualification of the candidate. The decision of the municipal executive committee shall be immediately transmitted to the municipal superintendent. If the municipal superintendent has not been notified of the decision of the municipal executive committee by 4:30 P.M. on the next business day following the actual knowledge of the vacancy, it shall be conclusively presumed that the municipal executive committee has decided not to fill the vacancy. If the municipal executive committee decides not to fill the vacancy, the nomination shall remain vacant. If the municipal executive committee decides to fill the vacancy, the vacancy shall be filled by a substitute nomination made by the municipal executive committee or a subcommittee thereof appointed for that purpose.

Any vacancy which occurs in any party nomination filled by a primary and which is created by reason of the withdrawal of a candidate 60 or more days prior to the date of the election shall be filled as follows:

By the person seeking nomination in such primary who received the second highest total of votes cast in such primary for that office, provided that such person received not less than 40 percent of the votes cast for that office; or

In the event no person received the vote total required under subparagraph (A) of this paragraph, such vacancy shall be filled in the same manner as provided in subparagraph (A), (B), (C), or (D) of paragraph (1) of this subsection, as appropriate.

Any vacancy which occurs in any party nomination filled by a primary and which is created by reason of the withdrawal of a candidate less than 60 days prior to the date of the election shall not be filled. If the ballots have been printed, the Secretary of State, the county superintendent, or the municipal superintendent may reprint the ballots to omit the name of the withdrawn candidate. All votes cast for the withdrawn candidate shall be void and shall not be counted. Prominent notices shall be posted in all polling places in which the name of the withdrawn candidate appears on the ballot stating that such candidate has withdrawn and that all votes cast for such withdrawn candidate shall be void and shall not be counted.

Any vacancy occurring in any body nomination or party nomination filled by means other than by primary, by reason of the withdrawal, death, or disqualification of any candidate after nomination, may be filled by a substitute nomination made by such committee as is authorized by the rules and regulations of the party or body to make nominations in the event of vacancies on the party or body ticket.

If the withdrawal, death, or disqualification of a candidate after nomination for any public office would at the time of such event result in there being no candidate for that office on the ballot in the general election, then the vacancy shall be filled by a special primary which shall be open only to the party of such deceased, withdrawn, or disqualified candidate and the office shall be filled by a special election as provided in Code Section 21-2-540.

The qualifying fee shall be returned to the candidate in the event such candidate withdraws, dies, or is disqualified prior to the close of the qualifying period; however, after the close of the qualifying period, the qualifying fee shall not be returned to the candidate for any reason including withdrawal, death, or disqualification; provided, however, that, if such disqualification is the result of an error or negligence of the officer with whom such candidate qualified and not the result of any action of the candidate and such error or negligence is verified in writing by the Secretary of State, such fee may be refunded to the candidate.

Upon the making of any such substitute nomination, in the manner prescribed in subsection (b) or (c) of this Code section, it shall be the duty of the chairperson and secretary of the convention or committee making the nomination to file with the Secretary of State or with the superintendent, as the case may be, a nomination certificate which shall be signed by such chairperson and secretary. Every such certificate of nomination shall be sworn to by the chairperson and secretary before an officer qualified to administer oaths.

In the event of the death of a candidate on the ballot in a nonpartisan election prior to such nonpartisan election, such candidate’s name shall remain on the ballot and all votes cast for such candidate shall be counted. If the deceased candidate receives the requisite number of votes to be elected, such contest shall be handled as a failure to fill the office under Code Section 21-2-504. If the deceased candidate receives enough votes to be in a run-off election, such run-off election shall be conducted as provided in Code Section 21-2-501 and the candidates in such runoff shall be determined in accordance with paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of Code Section 21-2-501.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-1003, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1968, p. 871, § 6; Ga. L. 1969, p. 329, §§ 9, 10; Ga. L. 1970, p. 347, § 13; Ga. L. 1978, p. 781, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 21; Ga. L. 1985, p. 1430, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 1360, § 7; Ga. L. 1989, p. 643, § 3; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1406, § 3; Ga. L. 1995, p. 408, § 1; Ga. L. 1996, p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1997, p. 590, § 10; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 21, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 269, § 7; Ga. L. 2005, p. 253, § 16/HB 244; Ga. L. 2008, p. 781, § 7/HB 1112; Ga. L. 2012, p. 995, § 7/SB 92; Ga. L. 2021, p. 14, § 13/SB 202.

The 2021 amendment,

effective March 25, 2021, added subsection (g).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2021, p. 14, § 1/SB 202, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Election Integrity Act of 2021.”’

Ga. L. 2021, p. 14, § 2/SB 202, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “The General Assembly finds and declares that:

“(1) Following the 2018 and 2020 elections, there was a significant lack of confidence in Georgia election systems, with many electors concerned about allegations of rampant voter suppression and many electors concerned about allegations of rampant voter fraud;

“(2) Many Georgia election processes were challenged in court, including the subjective signature-matching requirements, by Georgians on all sides of the political spectrum before and after the 2020 general election;

“(3) The stress of the 2020 elections, with a dramatic increase in absentee-by-mail ballots and pandemic restrictions, demonstrated where there were opportunities to update existing processes to reduce the burden on election officials and boost voter confidence;

“(4) The changes made in this legislation in 2021 are designed to address the lack of elector confidence in the election system on all sides of the political spectrum, to reduce the burden on election officials, and to streamline the process of conducting elections in Georgia by promoting uniformity in voting. Several examples will help explain how these goals are achieved;

“(5) The broad discretion allowed to local officials for advance voting dates and hours led to significant variations across the state in total number of hours of advance voting, depending on the county. More than 100 counties have never offered voting on Sunday and many counties offered only a single day of weekend voting. Requiring two Saturday voting days and two optional Sunday voting days will dramatically increase the total voting hours for voters across the State of Georgia, and all electors in Georgia will have access to multiple opportunities to vote in person on the weekend for the first time;

“(6) Some counties in 2020 received significant infusions of grant funding for election operations, while other counties received no such funds. Promoting uniformity in the distribution of funds to election operations will boost voter confidence and ensure that there is no political advantage conferred by preferring certain counties over others in the distribution of funds;

“(7) Elections in Georgia are administered by counties, but that can lead to problems for voters in counties with dysfunctional election systems. Counties with long-term problems of lines, problems with processing of absentee ballots, and other challenges in administration need accountability, but state officials are limited in what they are able to do to address those problems. Ensuring there is a mechanism to address local election problems will promote voter confidence and meet the goal of uniformity;

“(8) Elections are a public process and public participation is encouraged by all involved, but the enthusiasm of some outside groups in sending multiple absentee ballot applications in 2020, often with incorrectly filled-in voter information, led to significant confusion by electors. Clarifying the rules regarding absentee ballot applications will build elector confidence while not sacrificing the opportunities for electors to participate in the process;

“(9) The lengthy absentee ballot process also led to elector confusion, including electors who were told they had already voted when they arrived to vote in person. Creating a definite period of absentee voting will assist electors in understanding the election process while also ensuring that opportunities to vote are not diminished, especially when many absentee ballots issued in the last few days before the election were not successfully voted or were returned late;

“(10) Opportunities for delivering absentee ballots to a drop box were first created by the State Election Board as a pandemic response. The drop boxes created by rule no longer existed in Georgia law when the emergency rules that created them expired. The General Assembly considered a variety of options and constructed a system that allows the use of drop boxes, while also ensuring the security of the system and providing options in emergency situations;

“(11) The lengthy nine-week runoffs in 2020 were exhausting for candidates, donors, and electors. By adding ranked choice voting for military and overseas voters, the run-off period can be shortened to a more manageable period for all involved, easing the burden on election officials and on electors;

“(12) Counting absentee ballots in 2020 took an incredibly long time in some counties. Creating processes for early processing and scanning of absentee ballots will promote elector confidence by ensuring that results are reported quickly;

“(13) The sanctity of the precinct was also brought into sharp focus in 2020, with many groups approaching electors while they waited in line. Protecting electors from improper interference, political pressure, or intimidation while waiting in line to vote is of paramount importance to protecting the election system and ensuring elector confidence;

“(14) Ballot duplication for provisional ballots and other purposes places a heavy burden on election officials. The number of duplicated ballots has continued to rise dramatically from 2016 through 2020. Reducing the number of duplicated ballots will significantly reduce the burden on election officials and creating bipartisan panels to conduct duplication will promote elector confidence;

“(15) Electors voting out of precinct add to the burden on election officials and lines for other electors because of the length of time it takes to process a provisional ballot in a precinct. Electors should be directed to the correct precinct on election day to ensure that they are able to vote in all elections for which they are eligible;

“(16) In considering the changes in 2021, the General Assembly heard hours of testimony from electors, election officials, and attorneys involved in voting. The General Assembly made significant modifications through the legislative process as it weighed the various interests involved, including adding further weekend voting, changing parameters for out-of-precinct voting, and adding transparency for ballot images; and

“(17) While each of the changes in this legislation in 2021 stands alone and is severable under Code Section 1-1-3, the changes in total reflect the General Assembly’s considered judgment on the changes required to Georgia’s election system to make it ‘easy to vote and hard to cheat,’ applying the lessons learned from conducting an election in the 2020 pandemic.”

Law reviews.

For annual survey of local government law, see 57 Mercer L. Rev. 289 (2005).

For article, “SB 202: Revisions to Georgia’s Election and Voting Procedures,” see 38 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 105 (2021).

21-2-135.
Designation of specific office sought where office has multiple officeholders with same title.

In the case of a public office having multiple officeholders with the same title, each candidate, including write-in candidates, shall designate the specific office he or she is seeking, name the person such candidate is seeking to succeed, and give such other appropriate designation as may be required by the Secretary of State or election superintendent each time such candidate qualifies with his or her party in the case of a primary, files a notice of candidacy in the case of an election, or files a notice of candidacy as a write-in candidate. The designation of the specific office and the name of the person whom a candidate is seeking to succeed in the case of a public office having multiple officeholders shall be entered on the ballot and ballot labels in such manner that in the ensuing primary or election such candidate shall only oppose the other candidate or candidates, if any, who designated the same specific office and the same name.

In the case of a candidate, including a write-in candidate, seeking one of two or more municipal public offices, each having the same title and each being filled at the same election by the vote of the same electors, the applicable municipal charter or ordinance provisions shall govern whether such candidate shall designate the specific office he or she is seeking. If required to designate the specific office, the candidate shall name his or her incumbent or give other appropriate designation as specified in the charter or ordinance. Such designation shall be entered on the ballot and ballot labels in such manner that in the ensuing municipal primary or election such candidate shall only oppose the other candidate or candidates, if any, designating the same specific office.

In the case of the office of judge of a state court, judge of a superior court, Judge of the Court of Appeals, or Justice of the Supreme Court, the name of the person such candidate is seeking to succeed and such other designation as may be required by the Secretary of State or election superintendent shall be included in the title of the office on the ballot in all nonpartisan elections.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-1002, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Code 1933, § 34-1015, enacted by Ga. L. 1970, p. 347, § 13; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1190, § 5; Ga. L. 1984, p. 133, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 631, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 52, § 7; Ga. L. 2001, p. 269, § 8.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1983, p. 1190, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provided that it was the intent of that Act to implement the provisions of Ga. Const. 1983, Art. VI, Sec. VII, Para. I.

21-2-136.
Restriction on number of offices for which an individual may be nominated or be a candidate at any one election.

No person shall be nominated, nor shall any person be a candidate in a primary, election, or special election, for more than one of the following public offices to be filled at any one election or special election: Governor, Lieutenant Governor, Secretary of State, Attorney General, State School Superintendent, Commissioner of Insurance, Commissioner of Agriculture, Commissioner of Labor, United States senator or representative in Congress, Public Service Commissioner, Justice of the Supreme Court, Judge of the Court of Appeals, members of the Senate and House of Representatives of the General Assembly, judge of superior court, district attorney, any elected county officer, and any elected municipal officer.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-1014, enacted by Ga. L. 1970, p. 347, § 13; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 855, § 4; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 52, § 8; Ga. L. 2001, p. 240, § 8.

21-2-137.
Qualifying with two political parties; qualifying as independent or political body candidate and as political party candidate.

No person shall qualify with any political party as a candidate for nomination to any public office when such person has qualified for the same primary with another political party as a candidate for nomination by that party for any public office; nor shall a state, county, or municipal executive committee of any political party certify any person as the candidate of that party when such person has previously qualified as a candidate for nomination for any public office for the same primary with another political party. No person shall file a notice of candidacy as an independent or political body candidate for any public office when such person has qualified for the same office to be filled at the same election with any political party; nor shall any person qualify with any political party when such person has filed a notice of candidacy as an independent or political body candidate for the same office to be filled at the same election.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-1016, enacted by Ga. L. 1975, p. 686, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 535, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1.

21-2-138.
Nonpartisan elections for judicial offices.

The names of all candidates who have qualified with the Secretary of State for the office of judge of a superior court, Judge of the Court of Appeals, or Justice of the Supreme Court of this state and the names of all candidates who have qualified with the election superintendent for the office of judge of a state court shall be placed on the ballot in a nonpartisan election to be held and conducted jointly with the general primary in each even-numbered year. No candidates for any such office shall be nominated by a political party or by a petition as a candidate of a political body or as an independent candidate. Candidates for any such office shall have their names placed on the nonpartisan portion of each ballot by complying with the requirements prescribed in Code Section 21-2-132 specifically related to such nonpartisan candidates and by paying the requisite qualifying fees as prescribed in Code Section 21-2-131. Candidates shall be listed on the official ballot in a nonpartisan election as provided in Code Sections 21-2-284.1 and 21-2-285.1, respectively. Except as otherwise specified in this chapter, the procedures to be employed in conducting the nonpartisan election of judges of state courts, judges of superior courts, Judges of the Court of Appeals, and Justices of the Supreme Court shall conform as nearly as practicable to the procedures governing general elections; and such general election procedures as are necessary to complete this nonpartisan election process shall be adopted in a manner consistent with such nonpartisan elections.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-1016, enacted by Ga. L. 1975, p. 1251, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 1190, § 6; Ga. L. 1984, p. 133, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 1490, § 7; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 269, § 9; Ga. L. 2005, p. 253, § 17/HB 244; Ga. L. 2011, p. 678, § 3/HB 158.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1983, p. 1190, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provided that it was the intent of that Act to implement the provisions of Ga. Const. 1983, Art. VI, Sec. VII, Para. I.

Law reviews.

For note on the 2001 amendment of this Code section, see 18 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 96 (2001).

For comment, “Awakening a Slumbering Giant: Georgia’s Judicial Selection System After

White

and

Weaver

,” see 56 Mercer L. Rev. 1035 (2005).

For note, “The Case of the Vanishing Supreme Court Contest:

Barrow v. Raffensperger

Eliminates the Power of the People to Elect their Appellate, Superior, and State Court Judges,” see 72 Mercer L. Rev. 957 (2021).

21-2-139.
Nonpartisan elections authorized; conduct.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter to the contrary, the General Assembly may provide by local Act for the election in nonpartisan elections of candidates to fill county judicial offices, offices of local boards of education, and offices of consolidated governments which are filled by the vote of the electors of said county or political subdivision. Except as otherwise provided in this Code section, the procedures to be employed in such nonpartisan elections shall conform as nearly as practicable to the procedures governing nonpartisan elections as provided in this chapter. Except as otherwise provided in this Code section, the election procedures established by any existing local law which provides for the nonpartisan election of candidates to fill county offices shall conform to the general procedures governing nonpartisan elections as provided in this chapter, and such nonpartisan elections shall be conducted in accordance with the applicable provisions of this chapter, notwithstanding the provisions of any existing local law. For those offices for which the General Assembly, pursuant to this Code section, provided by local Act for election in nonpartisan primaries and elections, such offices shall no longer require nonpartisan primaries. Such officers shall be elected in nonpartisan elections held and conducted in conjunction with the general primary in even-numbered years in accordance with this chapter without a prior nonpartisan primary. This Code section shall apply to all nonpartisan elections for members of consolidated governments. All nonpartisan elections for members of consolidated governments shall be governed by the provisions of this Code section and shall be considered county elections and not municipal elections for the purposes of this Code section. Nonpartisan elections for municipal offices shall be conducted on the dates provided in the municipal charter.

Either a political party, as defined in this chapter, or a nonpartisan municipal executive committee duly registered with the city clerk may conduct a municipal primary for the purpose of electing its own officials or nominating candidates for municipal elections. Every primary held for such purpose shall be presided over and conducted in the manner prescribed by the rules and regulations of such party or nonpartisan municipal executive committee, not inconsistent with the law and the rules and regulations of the State Election Board; provided, however, that all such primaries must be conducted in such manner as to guarantee the secrecy of the ballot.

Municipalities may provide by their charter or by ordinance that no political party shall conduct primaries for the purpose of nominating candidates for municipal elections; provided, however, that the existing provisions of any charter or ordinance prohibiting primaries by political parties shall not be repealed by this subsection.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-139

, enacted by Ga. L. 1983, p. 1190, § 7; Ga. L. 1985, p. 496, § 4; Ga. L. 1994, p. 131, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 269, § 10; Ga. L. 2005, p. 253, § 18/HB 244; Ga. L. 2011, p. 678, § 4/HB 158; Ga. L. 2012, p. 995, § 9/SB 92; Ga. L. 2018, p. 1112, § 21/SB 365.

The 2018 amendment,

effective May 8, 2018, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “local boards of education” for “local school boards” in the middle of the first sentence of subsection (a).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1983, p. 1190, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provided that it was the intent of that Act to implement the provisions of Ga. Const. 1983, Art. VI, Sec. VII, Para. I.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 995, § 45/SB 92, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Section 9 of this Act is not intended by the General Assembly to change the effect of existing law but only to clarify the intent of the General Assembly in enacting the original legislation.”

Ga. L. 2012, p. 995, § 46(b)/SB 92, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Section 9 of this Act shall become effective on the first date upon which candidates may begin qualifying for the general primary in 2012; provided, however, that if implementation of Section 9 is not permissible on such date under the federal Voting Rights Act of 1965, as amended, then Section 9 shall become effective on January 1, 2013.”

The United States Department of Justice objected to Section 9 (which added the sixth and seventh sentences in subsection (a)) under Section 5 of the Voting Rights Act of 1965, as amended, on December 21, 2012. However, in the case of Howard v. Augusta-Richmond County Commission, Case No. 1:14-cv-00097-JRH-BKE, Unit-ed States District Court for the Southern District of Georgia, Augusta Division, decided May 13, 2014, the court found that, in light of the holding of the United States Supreme Court in Shelby County v. Holden,

133 S. Ct. 2612

,

186 L. Ed. 2

d 651 (2013), such objection under Section 5 was unenforceable and Section 9 was effective.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Ballot secrecy, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Election Code, Ballots, § 183-1-11-.01.

Law reviews.

For note on the 2001 amendment of this Code section, see 18 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 96 (2001).